Virginia statutes. Title 33.1. Highways, Bridges and Ferries.
Chapter 18.
Virginia-North Carolina Interstate Toll Road Compact.

Sec.

33.1-465. [Repealed.]

The number of this chapter

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2006 act having been Chapter 917.

§ 33.1-465.

Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 481, cl. 1, effective July 1, 2009.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2006 act having been

§

33.1-464

.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2006, c. 917, cl. 2, provides: "This act shall become effective upon its enactment by the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of North Carolina, in accordance with applicable federal law."

Acts 2008, c. 481, which repealed this section, in cl. 2 provided: "That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2009."